Washington statutes.
RCW 27.44.030

Intent.

The legislature hereby declares that:

(1) Native Indian burial grounds and historic graves are acknowledged to be a finite, irreplaceable, and nonrenewable cultural resource, and are an intrinsic part of the cultural heritage of the people of Washington. The legislature recognizes the value and importance of respecting all graves, and the spiritual significance of such sites to the people of this state;

(2) There have been reports and incidents of deliberate interference with native Indian and historic graves for profit-making motives;

(3) There has been careless indifference in cases of accidental disturbance of sites, graves, and burial grounds;

(4) Indian burial sites, cairns, glyptic markings, and historic graves located on public and private land are to be protected and it is therefore the legislature's intent to encourage voluntary reporting and respectful handling in cases of accidental disturbance and provide enhanced penalties for deliberate desecration.

[ 1989 c 44 s 1.]